sv: Tågvisslans ljudkaraktär: Luftig; Balanserad; Ljus; Surrande; Väsande; Mörk; Fyllig; Genomträngande; Ren; Skrovlig; Len; Dämpad; Varm; Övrigt
th: ลักษณะเสียงหวีดรถไฟ: โปร่ง; สมดุล; สว่าง; สั่นกังวาน; เป่าลม; ทุ้ม; นุ่มนวล; แหลมทะลุทะลวง; บริสุทธิ์; แหบพร่า; ราบรื่น; นุ่ม; อบอุ่น; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Traukinio švilpuko garso personažas: Erdvus; Subalansuotas; Skardus; Zvimbiantis; Šnypščiantis; Tamsus; Švelnus; Veriantis; Tyras; Karkia; Tolygus; Tylus; Šiltas; Kita
es: Sonido del silbato de tren: Aireado; Equilibrado; Brillante; Zumbante; Soplado; Oscuro; Suave; Penetrante; Puro; Áspero; Fluido; Tenue; Cálido; Otro
pt-BR: Apito de trem caráter sonoro: Arejado; Equilibrado; Brilhante; Zumbido; Soprado; Escuro; Aveludado; Penetrante; Puro; Áspero; Suave; Macio; Quente; Outro
fi: Junapillin sointi: Ilmava; Tasapainoinen; Kirkas; Suriseva; Suhiseva; Tumma; Täyteläinen; Läpitunkeva; Puhdas; Karhea; Tasainen; Pehmeä; Lämmin; Muu
sl-SI: Zvočni značaj vlakovne piščali: Zračen; Uravnotežen; Svetel; Brneč; Šumeč; Temen; Mehek; Prodoren; Čist; Hrapav; Gladek; Nežen; Topel; Drugo
nb: Lydkarakter for togfløyte: Luftig; Balansert; Lys; Summende; Chiffy; Mørk; Rund; Skjærende; Ren; Raspende; Myk; Dempet; Varm; Annet
pl: Dźwięk gwizdka pociągu: Powietrzny; Zrównoważony; Jasny; Bzyczący; Świszczący; Ciemny; Łagodny; Przeszywający; Czysty; Chrapliwy; Gładki; Miękki; Ciepły; Inne
fr: Caractère sonore du sifflet de train: Aérien; Équilibré; Brillant; Bourdonnant; Soufflé; Sombre; Doux; Perçant; Pur; Rauque; Lisse; Doux; Chaud; Autre
da: Lydkarakter for togfløjte: Luftig; Balanceret; Lys; Summende; Susende; Mørk; Mild; Gennemtrængende; Ren; Hæs; Jævn; Blød; Varm; Andet
bg-BG: Характер на звука на влакова свирка: Въздушен; Балансиран; Ярък; Бръмчащ; Свистящ; Тъмен; Мек; Пронзителен; Чист; Дрезгав; Гладък; Нежен; Топъл; Друго
hu: Vonatsíp hangkaraktere: Levegős; Kiegyensúlyozott; Fényes; Zizegő; Sziszegő; Sötét; Lágy; Éles; Tiszta; Érdes; Sima; Puha; Meleg; Egyéb
zh-TW: 火車汽笛聲音特性: 帶氣聲; 均衡; 明亮; 嗡嗡聲; 吹氣聲; 低沉; 柔和; 刺耳; 純淨; 沙啞; 平滑; 輕柔; 溫暖; 其他
pt-PT: Característica sonora da buzina de comboio: Soprado; Equilibrado; Brilhante; Zumbidor; Sibilante; Escuro; Aveludado; Penetrante; Puro; Rouco; Fluido; Suave; Quente; Outro
zh-CN: 火车汽笛声特征: 空灵; 均衡; 明亮; 嗡嗡声; 气声; 低沉; 圆润; 刺耳; 纯净; 沙哑; 平滑; 柔和; 温暖; 其他
de: Klangcharakter der Zugpfeife: Luftig; Ausgewogen; Hell; Schnarrend; Hauchig; Dunkel; Weich; Durchdringend; Rein; Rau; Sanft; Leise; Warm; Sonstige
ko: 기차 호루라기 음색: 공기 섞인; 균형 잡힌; 밝은; 윙윙거리는; 쉭쉭거리는; 어두운; 부드러운; 찌르는 듯한; 순수한; 거친; 매끄러운; 부드러운; 따뜻한; 기타
ro-RO: Caracterul sonor al fluierului de tren: Aerisit; Echilibrat; Luminos; Bâzâitor; Suflător; Închis; Cald; Pătrunzător; Pur; Aspru; Lin; Moale; Cald; Altele
hr-HR: Karakter zvuka zviždaljke vlaka: Prozračno; Uravnoteženo; Svijetlo; Zujavo; Šuštavo; Tamno; Mekano; Prodorno; Čisto; Hrapavo; Glatko; Blago; Toplo; Ostalo
en: Train whistle sound character: Airy; Balanced; Bright; Buzzy; Chiffy; Dark; Mellow; Piercing; Pure; Raspy; Smooth; Soft; Warm; Other
it: Carattere del suono del fischietto per treno: Arioso; Bilanciato; Brillante; Ronzante; Soffiato; Scuro; Morbido; Penetrante; Puro; Rauco; Fluido; Tenue; Caldo; Altro
tr: Tren düdüğü ses karakteri: Havadar; Dengeli; Parlak; Cızırtılı; Islıklı; Karanlık; Tok; Delici; Saf; Pürüzlü; Pürüzsüz; Yumuşak; Sıcak; Diğer
ru: Характер звучания железнодорожного свистка: Воздушный; Сбалансированный; Яркий; Жужжащий; С придыханием; Глухой; Мягкий; Пронзительный; Чистый; Хриплый; Плавный; Тихий; Теплый; Другое
cs: Zvuk vlakové píšťaly: Vzdušný; Vyvážený; Jasný; Bzučivý; Se šelestem (chiffy); Temný; Jemný; Pronikavý; Čistý; Chraplavý; Hladký; Měkký; Teplý; Jiné
sk-SK: Zvuk vlakovej píšťalky: Vzdušný; Vyvážený; Jasný; Bzučivý; Šumivý; Temný; Jemný; Prenikavý; Čistý; Drsný; Hladký; Mäkký; Teplý; Iné
ja: 列車汽笛音質タイプ: エアリー; バランス; ブライト; バジー; チフィー; ダーク; メロウ; ピアシング (突き抜けるような音); ピュア; ラスピー; スムース; ソフト; ウォーム; その他
vi: Đặc điểm âm thanh còi tàu: Có nhiều hơi; Cân bằng; Sáng; Rè; Âm bật; Trầm; Mượt mà; Chói tai; Thuần khiết; Khàn; Êm êm; Mềm mại; Ấm áp; Khác
nl: Treinfluit geluidskarakter: Luchtig; Gebalanceerd; Helder; Zoemend; Blazend; Donker; Mellow; Doordringend; Puur; Rasperig; Glad; Zacht; Warm; Overig
el: Χαρακτήρας ήχου σφυρίχτρας τρένου: Αέρινος; Ισορροπημένος; Φωτεινός; Με βόμβο; Με φύσημα; Σκοτεινός; Ήπιος; Διαπεραστικός; Καθαρός; Τραχύς; Ομαλός; Απαλός; Ζεστός; Άλλο